Mississippi, session 2026, SB2144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Town of Rolling Fork for the purpose of defraying the costs of certain infrastructure projects for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................. $ 3,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act are authorized for the following purposes: (a)  To defray costs of improvements to the Emergency Management services, including 911 and E911 services; (b)  To defray costs associated with improvements to or replacement of roads, stormwater and sewage infrastructure; and (c)  To defray costs associated with the construction of public facilities, including a police station. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.